District of Columbia statutes.
7-138

Access to building for inspection.

The Mayor may, without fee or hindrance, enter, examine, and inspect all vessels, premises, grounds, structures, buildings, and every part thereof in the District of Columbia for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter and the rules and regulations issued hereunder. The owner or his agent or representative and the lessee or occupant of any such vessel, premises, grounds, structure, or building, or part thereof, and every person having the care and management thereof shall at all times when required by any such officer or employee give them free access thereto and refusal so to do shall be punishable as a violation of this subchapter.

Aug. 11, 1939, ch. 601, § 8
Aug. 8, 1946, 60 Stat. 921, ch. 871, § 2
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-83, § 3(d), 32 DCR 7276
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-194, § 902(g), 49 DCR 5306
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 44(c), 51 DCR 881
This section is referenced in § 7-140.
1981 Ed., § 6-124.
1973 Ed., § 6-119f.
D.C. Law 14-194 substituted “Mayor” for “Director of the Department of Human Services”.
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.